Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,139.03
Student Loan Default Fee Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Student Loan Default Fee Revolving Fund is created. The fund shall be under the direction of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. The commission shall remit all revenue received from fees charged under section 85-9,139.02 to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Expenditures may be made from the fund, after appropriation by the Legislature, for payments to the federal government for relevant default cost fees charged to the State of Nebraska by the United States Secretary of Education or to reimburse the General Fund for any such payments which have been made to the federal government.

(2) If not inconsistent with federal law, up to ten percent of the revenue remitted to the fund may be appropriated and used to defray the administrative expenses of the activities undertaken pursuant to section 85-9,139.02.

(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1996, LB 29, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.